Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5210HZ (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 2798 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 452A.16 Exempt fuel ââ implements 1 of husbandry. 2 1. The excise tax under section 452A.3 shall not be imposed 3 or collected on ethanol blended gasoline formulated with more 4 than eighty-five percent by volume of ethanol when purchased at 5 a terminal or refinery rack exclusively for use in an implement 6 of husbandry used in agricultural production. 7 2. A person who purchases fuel on which an excise tax is not 8 collected in accordance with subsection 1 shall substantiate 9 the purchase with an exemption certificate provided by the 10 department. The exemption certificate must be complete and 11 correct according to the requirements of the director, signed 12 by the purchaser, and retained by the supplier. A supplier 13 shall retain exemption certificates for at least three years. 14 3. The department shall disallow all sales of gallonage 15 described in this section unless proof is established by an 16 exemption certificate. 17 4. If a purchaser uses or disposes of fuel that was 18 purchased using an exemption certificate pursuant to subsection 19 2 in a nonexempt manner, the purchaser is solely liable for the 20 excise tax and shall remit the tax directly to the department. 21